Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-331
Wayne State College; Legislative intent to appropriate funds for cooperative programs.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate fifty thousand dollars for fiscal year 2022-23 from the General Fund to the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges for cooperative programs with Wayne State College.

Laws 2022, LB902, § 7.